Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-2307
Rules and regulations.

The State Department
of Education may adopt and promulgate rules and regulations to carry out the
Diploma of High School Equivalency Assistance Act. Such rules and regulations
shall include, but not be limited to, provisions related to the collection
of information necessary to provide the assistance provided for in section
79-2304.

Laws 2013, LB366, § 7.